Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7513
Policy form filings.

(1) Each insurer to which this section applies as provided in section 44-7508.01 shall file with the director every policy form and related attachment rule and every modification thereof which it proposes to use. No insurer to which this section applies shall issue a contract or policy except in accordance with the filings that are in effect for such insurer as provided in the Property and Casualty Insurance Rate and Form Act except as provided in subsection (6) or (7) of this section, section 44-7514, or rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to section 44-7515.

(2) Every filing shall state its proposed effective date, which shall not be prior to the date that the director receives the filing. Instead of a specific date, a filing may indicate that it will be effective a reasonable specified period of time after approval or that the insurer will notify the director of the effective date within ninety days after approval.

(3) Every policy form filing shall explain the intended use of such policy forms. Filings shall include a list of policy forms that will be replaced when the approval of a filing will result in the replacement of previously approved policy forms. In addition, insurers shall maintain listings of policy forms that have been filed and approved by the director so that such listings can be provided upon request.

(4) If additional information is needed to complete review of a policy form filing, the director may require the filer to furnish the information and in that event the review period in subsection (10) of this section shall commence on the date such information is received by the director. If a filer fails to furnish the required information within ninety days, the director may, by written notice sent to the insurer, deem the filing as withdrawn and not available for use.

(5) An insurer may authorize the director to accept policy form filings made on its behalf by an advisory organization.

(6)(a) Subject to the following requirements, policy forms unique in character and designed for and used with regard to an individual risk under common ownership subject to the rate filing provisions of section 44-7508 shall be exempt from the approval requirements contained in subsection (1) of this section.

(b) At the earliest practical opportunity, but no later than thirty days after the effective date of the policy using unfiled provisions, the insurer shall provide the prospective insured with a written listing of the policy forms that have not been approved by the director and receive written acknowledgment from prospective insureds for which it ultimately provides coverage. This requirement does not apply to renewals using the same unfiled policy forms.

(c) A policy form that has been used in this state or elsewhere by the insurer for another risk shall not be subject to the exemption provided by this subsection, except that an insurer may use a policy form previously developed for a single risk for a second risk if the policy form is filed for approval within sixty days after its second usage.

(d) The exemption provided by this subsection shall not apply to workers' compensation or excess workers' compensation insurance policy forms or to policy forms that, prior to their use by the insurer, had been filed by an advisory organization in this state or had been filed by the insurer in any jurisdiction, regardless of whether approval was received.

(e) The director may by rules and regulations or by order make specific restrictions relating to the exemption provided by this subsection and may require the informational filing of policy forms subject to such exemption within a reasonable time after their use.

(7) The director may by rules and regulations suspend or modify the filing requirements of this section as to any type of insurance or class of risk for which policy forms cannot practicably be filed before they are used. The director may examine insurers as is necessary to ascertain whether any policy forms affected by such rules and regulations meet the standards contained in the act.

(8) No filing or any supporting information provided by an insurer pursuant to this section shall be open to public inspection pursuant to sections 84-712 to 84-712.09 before the approval or disapproval of the filing unless publicly disclosed in an open court, open administrative proceeding, or open meeting or disclosed by the director pursuant to statute. Correspondence specifically relating to individual risks shall be confidential and may not be made public by the director except as may be compiled in summaries of such activity.

(9) The director shall review filings as soon as reasonably possible after they have been made. The director shall disapprove a filing that contains provisions, exceptions, or conditions that: (a) Are unjust, unfair, ambiguous, inconsistent, inequitable, misleading, deceptive, or contrary to public policy; (b) are written so as to encourage the misrepresentation of coverage; (c) fail to reasonably provide the general coverage for policies of that type; (d) fail to comply with the provisions or the intent of the laws of this state; or (e) would provide coverage contrary to the public interest.

(10) Within thirty days after receipt, the director shall approve filings that meet the requirements of the act, except that this review period may be extended for an additional period not to exceed thirty days if the director gives written notice within the original review period to the insurer or advisory organization. A filing shall be deemed to meet the requirements of the act unless disapproved by the director within the review period or any extension thereof.

(11) If, within the review period provided by subsection (10) of this section or any extension thereof, the director finds that a filing does not meet the requirements of the act, a written disapproval notice shall be sent to the insurer. Such notice shall specify in what respects the filing fails to meet these requirements and state that such filing shall not become effective.

(12) Filings shall become effective on their proposed effective date if approved or deemed approved on or before that date. Filings approved or deemed approved after their proposed effective dates shall become effective after notification by the insurer of a revised effective date, which shall not be prior to the date that the insurer mails the notification to the director. If an insurer fails to furnish a revised effective date within a reasonable period of time not less than ninety days, the director may, by written notice sent to the insurer, deem the filing as withdrawn and not available for use.

(13) An insurer or advisory organization whose filing is disapproved may, within thirty days after receipt of a disapproval notice, request a hearing in accordance with section 44-7532.

(14) If, at any time after approval, the director finds that a policy form, attachment rule, or modification thereof does not meet or no longer meets the requirements of the act, the director shall hold a hearing in accordance with section 44-7532.

(15) Any insured aggrieved with respect to any filing may make written application to the director for a hearing on such filing. The hearing application shall specify the grounds to be relied upon by the applicant. If the director finds that the hearing application is made in good faith, that a remedy would be available if the grounds are established, or that such grounds otherwise justify holding a hearing, the director shall hold a hearing in accordance with section 44-7532.

(16) If, after a hearing initiated pursuant to subsection (14) or (15) of this section, the director finds that a filing does not meet the requirements of the act, the director shall issue an order stating in what respects such filing fails to meet the requirements and when, within a reasonable period thereafter, such policy form or attachment rule shall no longer be used. Copies of the order shall be sent to the applicant, if applicable, and to every affected insurer and advisory organization. The order shall not affect any contract or policy made or issued prior to the expiration of the period set forth in the order.

Laws 2000, LB 1119, § 13;

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 53;

Laws 2003, LB 216, § 22;

Laws 2006, LB 875, § 12;

Laws 2019, LB469, § 7.